Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2713
Clerk of county court; invest money received; rules.

When any money received by the clerk of the county court is not immediately paid out and the investment of such money is not otherwise provided for by law, the clerk of the county court shall invest such money or portion thereof as may be provided for by rules issued by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1985, LB 326, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 891, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-532.01.